apertium-cat-cos.cos.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>aàbcdeèfghiìïjlmnoòpqrstuùüvzAÀBCDEÈFGHIÌÏJLMNOÒPQRSTUÙÜVZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Sustantiu"/>
    <sdef n="np"       c="Nom propi"/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverbi"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposició"/>
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjectiu"/>
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determinant"/>
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Verb modal"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"    c="Verb 'ser'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="Verb 'haver'"/>

    <sdef n="ind"      c="Indefinit"/>
    <sdef n="def"      c="Definit"/>
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogatiu"/>
    <sdef n="pro"      c="Proclític"/>
    <sdef n="ref"      c="Reflexiu"/>
    <sdef n="tn"       c="Tònic"/>

    <sdef n="ant"      c="Antròponim"/>

    <sdef n="inf"      c="Infinitiu"/>
    <sdef n="ger"      c="Gerundi"/>
    <sdef n="pp"       c="Participiu"/>
    <sdef n="pri"      c="Present d'indicatiu"/>
    <sdef n="pii"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="pis"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="prs"      c="Present de subjunctiu"/>
    <sdef n="cni"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="ifi"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="fti"      c=""/>

    <sdef n="m"        c="Masculí"/>
    <sdef n="f"        c="Feminí"/>
    <sdef n="mf"       c="Masculí / feminí"/>
 
    <sdef n="p1"       c="Primera persona"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Segona persona"/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Tercera persona"/>

    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"       c="Singular / plural"/>
  
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"   c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"   c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs> 

    <!-- SECTION: Miscellaneous -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e><re>[’'‘]</re><p><l/><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>       <p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="è__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sì__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chì__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="/di__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>di</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d'</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>di</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="à__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="/u__det">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>i</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>e</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="un__det">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="eiu__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tù__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ell/u__prn">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="mi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ti__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="si__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ci__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="quattru__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dui__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="ann/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="scienz/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ricerc/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>he</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="relazion/e__n">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="zitell/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="Jaume__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Maria__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="vechj/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <e lm="è"><i>è</i><par n="è__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="è__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sì"><i>sì</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="chì"><i>chì</i><par n="chì__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="di"><i></i><par n="/di__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="à"><i>à</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cù"><i>cù</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i></i><par n="/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__det"/></e>
    <e lm="eiu"><i>eiu</i><par n="eiu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tù"><i>tù</i><par n="tù__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ellu"><i>ell</i><par n="ell/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="mi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ti"><i>ti</i><par n="ti__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="si__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ci"><i>ci</i><par n="ci__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vi"><i>vi</i><par n="vi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dui"><i>dui</i><par n="dui__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trè"><i>trè</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="quattru"><i>quattru</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="cinque"><i>cinque</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sei"><i>sei</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sette"><i>sette</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ottu"><i>ottu</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nove"><i>nove</i><par n="quattru__num"/></e>
    <e lm="annu"><i>ann</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omu"><i>om</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ortu"><i>ort</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oggettu"><i>oggett</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ghjocu"><i>ghjoc</i><par n="ann/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zitellu"><i>zitell</i><par n="zitell/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="processu"><i>process</i><par n="zitell/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scienza"><i>scienz</i><par n="scienz/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forza"><i>forz</i><par n="scienz/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terra"><i>terr</i><par n="scienz/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ricerca"><i>ricerc</i><par n="ricerc/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traduzzione"><i>traduzzion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relazione"><i>relazion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tradizione"><i>tradizion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="distribuzione"><i>distribuzion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="regione"><i>region</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="infurmazione"><i>infurmazion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dispusizione"><i>dispusizion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manifestazione"><i>manifestazion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Jaume"><i>Jaume</i><par n="Jaume__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="vechju"><i>vechj</i><par n="vechj/u__adj"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
